Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-111] Temporary licensing. (a)
The commissioner may issue a temporary insurance producer license for a period
not to exceed one hundred eighty days without requiring an examination if the
commissioner deems that the temporary license is necessary for the servicing of
an insurance business in the following cases:

(1) To the surviving spouse or court-appointed
personal representative of a licensed insurance producer who dies or becomes
mentally or physically disabled to allow adequate time for the sale of the
insurance business owned or controlled by the producer or for the recovery or
return of the producer to the business or to provide for the training and
licensing of new personnel to operate the producer's business;

(2) To a member or employee of a business entity
licensed as an insurance producer, upon the death or disability of an
individual designated in the business entity application or the license;

(3) To the designee of a licensed insurance producer
entering active service in the armed forces of the United States of America; or

(4) In any other circumstance where the commissioner
deems that the public interest will best be served by the issuance of this
temporary license.

(b) The commissioner may by order limit the
authority of any temporary licensee in any way deemed necessary to protect
insureds and the public. The commissioner may require the temporary licensee
to have a suitable sponsor who is a licensed producer or insurer and who
assumes responsibility for all acts of the temporary licensee. The
commissioner may impose other similar requirements designed to protect insureds
and the public. The commissioner may by order suspend or revoke a temporary
license if the interest of insureds or the public are endangered. A temporary
license may not continue after the owner, the personal representative, or the
person controlling the business disposes of the business. [L 2001, c 216, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next